Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.238

Purchase of own capital stock authorized.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a bank, with the prior approval of the director, may purchase shares of its own capital stock.

(2) When a bank purchases such shares, its capital accounts shall be reduced appropriately. The shares shall be held as authorized but unissued shares.

[ 1994 c 92 s 24; 1986 c 279 s 12; 1985 c 305 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.04.238.]